Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.045

Board—Officers and staff—Powers and duties.

(1) The board shall annually elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary from its members.

(2) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(3) The board shall have a seal which shall be judicially noticed.

(4) The board shall keep records of its proceedings, and of any proceeding in court arising from or founded upon this chapter. Copies of these records certified as correct under the seal of the board are admissible in evidence as tending to prove the content of the records.

(5) The governor shall appoint an executive director of the board, who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The executive director may employ such personnel as is appropriate for carrying out the purposes of this chapter. The executive director shall hold a valid Washington license. The board may arrange for such volunteer assistance as it requires to perform its duties. Individuals or committees assisting the board constitute volunteers for purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW.

(6) The board shall file an annual report of its activities with the governor. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a statement of all receipts and disbursements. Upon request, the board shall mail a copy of each annual report to any member of the public.

(7) In making investigations concerning alleged violations of the provisions of this chapter and in all proceedings under RCW 18.04.295 or chapter 34.05 RCW, the board chair, or a member of the board, or a board designee acting in the chair's place, may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses appearing before the board, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take testimony, and require that documentary evidence be submitted.

(8) The board may review the publicly available professional work of licensees on a general and random basis, without any requirement of a formal complaint or suspicion of impropriety on the part of any particular licensee. If as a result of such review the board discovers reasonable grounds for a more specific investigation, the board may proceed under its investigative and disciplinary rules.

(9) The board may provide for consumer alerts and public protection information to be published regarding persons or firms who violate the provisions of this chapter or board rule and may provide general consumer protection information to the public.

(10) As provided in RCW 18.04.370, the board may enter into stipulated agreements and orders of assurance with persons who have violated the provisions of RCW 18.04.345 or certify the facts to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such person resides for criminal prosecution.

[ 2001 c 294 s 4; 1992 c 103 s 4; 1986 c 295 s 3; 1983 c 234 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.